Arkansas, session 2025, HB1545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds:
(1) Arkansas adopted the Interstate Compact on Educational
Opportunity for Military Children in 2013, but found it ineffective in
supporting National Guard and highly mobile active-duty families;
(2) To untether support for military families, Arkansas
established the Arkansas Military Child School Transitions Act of 2021,
expanding eligibility and resources offered to uniformed services families;
(3) Arkansas is the only state that has taken an independent,
parallel path outside of the compact to better serve our highly mobile
uniformed services families;
(4) On December 31, 2024, the United States Department of
Defense reported to the United States Congress that, "States could consider
the benefits of implementing the Arkansas model for a statute outside the
Compact"; and
(5) Arkansas is recognized for initiative, innovation, and
responsiveness to meeting emerging needs of uniformed services families.
(b) This act further improves the Arkansas Military Child School
*TNL129*
03-19-2025 14:25:09 TNL129

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 H3/19/25 HB1545
Transitions Act of 2021, § 6-28-101 et seq., by:
(1) Eliminating the one-year limitation on eligibility of
children of Gold Star families and medically separated or retired families to
be covered by this act;
(2) Allowing public schools to apply provisions of this act to
all students who apply for enrollment in a public school in addition to those
students who are dependents of members of the uniformed services;
(3) Defining actions for military services families to
accomplish when applying for enrollment in advance of their arrival in
Arkansas;
(4) Expanding authority of receiving districts' special
education staff members to proactively collaborate with sending districts to
facilitate a smooth transition of incoming students with disabilities; and
(5) Providing for the Purple Star School Program development and
administration.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-28-105 is amended to read as follows:
6-28-105. Application.
(a) This chapter shall apply to dependent children of:
(1) Members of the active duty and activated reserve components
of the uniformed services;
(2) Members or veterans Veterans of the uniformed services who
were severely injured in the line of duty and are medically discharged
separated or retired for a period of one (1) year following the medical
discharge or retirement;
(3) Members of the uniformed services who die while on active
duty or as a result of injuries sustained while on active duty for a period
of one (1) year following the death;
(4) Dual status military technicians; and
(5) Traditional members of the National Guard and reserve
components of the United States Armed Forces armed forces who are relocating
to the state for employment or to serve as a member of an Arkansas-based
reserve component unit.
(b) This chapter shall not apply to the dependent children of:
(1) Inactive members of the National Guard and reserve
components of the United States Armed Forces;
03-19-2025 14:25:09 TNL129

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 H3/19/25 HB1545
(2) Retired members of the uniformed services, except as
provided under subdivision (a)(3) of this section; and
(3) Other United States Department of Defense personnel and
other federal or state agency civilian and contract employees who are not
considered members of the uniformed services.
(c)(1)(b)(1) This chapter includes provisions and extends application
eligibility beyond the scope of the Interstate Compact on Educational
Opportunity for Military Children, § 6-4-301 et seq.
(2) In complying with this chapter, sending districts and
receiving districts may request the assistance of sending districts and
receiving districts outside of the state to provide services to uniformed
services families transferring to or from the state who are covered under
this chapter but may not be covered under the interstate compact.
(c) A public school may extend the provisions of this chapter to all
students relocating to the public school district or enrolling in the public
school under the Arkansas Opportunity Public School Choice Act, § 6-18-227,
or the Public School Choice Act of 2015, § 6-18-1901 et seq.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-28-108 is amended to read as follows:
6-28-108. Advance enrollment.
(a)(1) Members of the uniformed services shall under § 6-28-105 who
wish to enroll their children in public school should, as soon as possible,
provide advance notice to public schools regarding the enrollment of a
student under this chapter to ensure the best opportunity for a smooth
transition for their children.
(b) Upon receipt of official assignment notice or assignment orders,
the parent, foster parent, legal guardian, person having lawful control of a
child, or person standing in loco parentis to a child of a member of the
uniformed services may enroll, register, and coordinate education services
for his or her child, including without limitation a child with special
education needs or a child with a disability, in the public school of his or
her choice by:
(1) Determining, in consultation with military and public school
district officials, the public school in which he or she prefers to enroll
his or her child according to requirements under § 6-18-1909;
(2) Contacting the public school's designated military family
03-19-2025 14:25:09 TNL129

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 H3/19/25 HB1545
education coordinator with any questions or issues raised or information
needed by the parent, legal guardian, person having lawful control of a
child, or person standing in loco parentis to a child; and
(3) Remotely submitting electronically an enrollment application
for his or her child that shall include required documentation, including
without limitation:
(A) A copy of the official military assignment notice or
official assignment orders and military identification credentials of the
member of the uniformed services;
(B) The child's unofficial education record and
immunization records;
(C) Current coursework for the school in which the student
is enrolled if the coursework is not included in the student's unofficial
education record;
(D) A copy of the student's individualized education
program, family service plan under the Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq., or plan under section 504 of the
Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended, as applicable; and
(E) A list of any extracurricular activities in which the
student participates.
(2)(c) When a public school receives notice and an enrollment
application from a military family under subdivision (a)(1) of this section,
the public school shall treat the notice as a provisional enrollment and
provide the student with materials regarding:
(1) Provisionally enroll, provide placement for, and enter
academic course requests on behalf of the incoming student based on the
student's education record provided by his or her family or the sending
district;
(2) Provide the uniformed services family with information
either directly or on a Military Family link on the public school's or public
school district's website regarding:
(A) Academic courses Career-ready pathways and other
academic or education programs offered;
(B) Electives Required academic courses for each
curriculum and elective course options;
(C) Sports School and community-sponsored extracurricular
03-19-2025 14:25:09 TNL129

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 H3/19/25 HB1545
activities, including without limitation individual and team sports, clubs,
junior reserve officer training corps opportunities, and Purple Star School
program ambassadors; and
(D) Contact information for the designated military family
education coordinator and the Purple Star School program military family
education facilitator, if applicable; and
(D)(E) Other relevant information regarding the public
school.
(3)(d) A public school:
(A)(1) Shall, in determining the acceptance of a student's
enrollment in the public school, consider the:
(A) The student's enrollment application date and the
anticipated date of enrollment of a the student under subdivision (a)(1)
subsection (a) of this section in light of:;
(i)(B) Class sizes;
(ii)(C) Course prerequisites or conflicts; and
(iii)(D) The availability of elective courses;
(B)(2)(A) May preregister a student in anticipation of the
student's enrollment under subdivision (a)(1) of this section; and Shall not
deny a student enrollment in the public school or the public school district
under this section unless there is a lack of capacity.
(B) A lack of capacity may be claimed by a public school
district only if:
(i) The public school district has reached the
maximum student-to-teacher ratio allowed under federal law, state law, the
Standards for Accreditation for Public Schools and School Districts, state
rules, or other applicable federal regulations; and
(ii) The claim of lack of capacity is timely and
consistent with state and federal law;
(C)(3) May seek waivers from the State Board of Education to
accommodate a student under this section, including without limitation
required class ratios Shall not discriminate on the basis of gender, national
origin, race, ethnicity, religion, military family status, or disability;
(4) Notify a prospective student's family in writing regarding
whether the student's enrollment has been accepted or rejected within fifteen
(15) calendar days of receiving the student's enrollment application and
03-19-2025 14:25:09 TNL129

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 H3/19/25 HB1545
supporting documentation; and
(5) As soon as practicable, request that a sending district
provide a student's official education record as specified by § 6-28-107 to
confirm the student's provisional enrollment, placement, and course
preregistration conditions.
(b)(1)(e)(1) A student under this section shall receive equitable
access to academic courses.
(2)(A) A receiving district may enter academic course requests
on behalf of an incoming student under this section based on the student's
transcript of information sent by the student's family or the student's
sending district.
(B) Special power of attorney relative to the guardianship
of a student is sufficient for purposes of enrollment and all other actions
requiring parental participation and consent.
(c)(1)(f)(1) A receiving district shall not charge local tuition to a
student who transitions to the receiving district under this section and who
has been placed in the care of a noncustodial parent or other person standing
in loco parentis who lives in a jurisdiction other than that of the custodial
parent.
(2) A student who has been placed in the care of a noncustodial
parent or other person standing in loco parentis who lives in a jurisdiction
other than that of the custodial parent may continue to attend the school in
which he or she was enrolled while residing with the custodial parent.
(d)(g) A receiving district shall ensure a student who transitions
under this section has the opportunity to participate in extracurricular
activities, regardless of application deadlines, and to the extent that the
student is otherwise qualified.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-28-109 is amended to read as follows:
6-28-109. Virtual course enrollment.
(a) At the request of a military family, a receiving district may
enroll an inbound transitioning child of a military family in virtual
distance-learning or digital coursework, if available, to facilitate a smooth
transition between the student's previous coursework and the curriculum best
suited to ensure educational success in his or her new school.
(b) To prevent a student from losing course credit due to absences, a
03-19-2025 14:25:09 TNL129

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 H3/19/25 HB1545
public school may approve a student who has been granted one (1) or more
excused absences to:
(1) Access school coursework virtually; or
(2) Transfer to a virtual coursework program.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-28-113(b), concerning requirements a
receiving district must adhere to with regard to a student's special
education services under the Arkansas Military Child School Transitions Act
of 2021, is amended to read as follows:
(b) A receiving district:
(1) Shall make reasonable accommodations and modifications to
address the needs of incoming students with disabilities under this section;
and
(2) May perform subsequent evaluations to ensure a student who
transitions under this chapter has been appropriately placed in the receiving
district as soon as possible upon the student's arrival at the receiving
district;
(3) May request a meeting with a student's parents or legal
guardians and the individualized education program team at the sending
district from which the student transferred before the student's arrival at
the receiving district;
(4) May, upon review of a student's existing individualized
education program and with parental consent, request an evaluation by the
sending district, if the student is still enrolled in the sending district;
(5) May request an in-person meeting with the student's parents
or legal guardians and the student to confirm planned services upon the
adoption by the public school of the student's existing or amended
individualized education program; and
(6) May take any other action to ensure a student's smooth
transition under this chapter.


SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-28-116 is amended to read as follows:
6-28-116. New student reception programs — Military family education
coordinators.
(a) A Each public school with twenty (20) or more children of military
03-19-2025 14:25:09 TNL129

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 H3/19/25 HB1545
families enrolled as students under this chapter or a public school district
with at least three thousand (3,000) enrolled public school students district
and open-enrollment public charter school shall:
(1) Incorporate into the policies of the public school district
specific procedures that outline actions to take in support of students who
are the children of military families who transition to and from the public
school district; and
(2)(A)(1) Designate in each public school district a military
family education coordinator to serve as the primary point of contact for
each child of a military family and his or her parent or legal guardian;
(2) Annually by September 1 provide to the Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education the name and contact information of the
military family education coordinator; and
(3) Post in a section designated for Military Families on the
website of the public school the contact information for the military family
education coordinator.
(B)(b) The Each public school military family education coordinator
shall:
(i)(1) Have Possess specialized knowledge regarding the
educational needs of children of military families and the obstacles that
children of military families face in obtaining an education and unique
challenges faced by children of uniformed services families; and
(ii)(2) Be included in the establishment and adoption of a
public school district's and public school's parent and family engagement
plan as required under § 6-15-1702; and
(3) Serve as a navigator for uniformed services families by:
(A) Connecting the uniformed services families to
appropriate public school resources; and
(B) Connecting families with other uniformed services
families in the public school upon request.
(C) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education
shall supply relevant resources for the orientation and training of public
school military family education coordinators under this section.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-28-117 is amended to read as follows:
6-28-117. Reporting enrollment of children of members of the uniformed
03-19-2025 14:25:09 TNL129

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 H3/19/25 HB1545
services armed forces — Definition.
(a) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall require a
public school to report the enrollment of a student who is a child of a
uniformed services family with a parent who is an active duty or reserve
component member of the armed forces as required by the Every Student
Succeeds Act, 20 U.S.C. § 6311, as it existed on January 1, 2025:
(1) In the Arkansas Public School Computer Network; or
(2) As established by rule if the public school or public school
district does not report information through the Arkansas Public School
Computer Network.
(b) As used in this section, "armed forces" means a member of the
active duty or reserve components of the United States Army, United States
Navy, United States Air Force, United States Marine Corps, United States
Space Force, United States Coast Guard, and National Guard.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 6-28-204(b), concerning the duties of the
Arkansas Council for Military Children is amended to read as follows:
(b) The duties of the council are to:
(1) Assist state and local education agencies in the promotion
and, communication, delivery, and assessment of the provisions of this
chapter to inform state education authorities, public school district
officials, military commanders, and uniformed services families by:
(A) Assisting in the development, publication, and
distribution through schools and military commands of a digital family
guidebook that provides information on the provisions of this chapter;
(B) At least biennially publicly surveying uniformed
services families to assess awareness of this chapter, provisions of the
Arkansas Opportunity Public School Choice Act, § 6-18-227, provisions of the
Public School Choice Act of 2015, § 6-18-1901 et seq., available military
family resources, and unmet uniformed services family needs; and
(C) Developing and promulgating student arrival and
departure surveys of uniformed services families to provide an assessment of
the effectiveness of this chapter and other related programs;
(2) Assist state and local education agencies with the
orientation and training of district military family education coordinators
and school military education facilitators on provisions of this chapter;
03-19-2025 14:25:09 TNL129

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 H3/19/25 HB1545
(3) Develop and promote the Purple Star School program as
required by § 6-28-302;
(3)(4) Assist in the development and delivery of programs that
inform current and former uniformed services families, including Gold Star
families, of the need for self-identification in order to assure accurate
accounting of children of uniformed services families enrolled in public
school districts to self-identify to assure:
(A) They are recognized for their service; and
(B) That the student is accounted for in all applicable
programs for which the student qualifies; and
(4)(5) Assist in the development and administration of programs
recognizing education agencies, public schools, and leaders who have
established or contributed to programs facilitating successful school
transitions of children of uniformed services families.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 6-28-204(i), concerning administrative
staff to support the Chair of the Arkansas Council for Military Children, is
amended to read as follows:
(i) The council shall post on its website or post by utilizing another
form of public notice, including without limitation social media, information
for uniformed services families, including without limitation information
regarding:
(1) The purpose, duties, membership composition, meeting
agendas, and meeting minutes of the council;
(2) Resources to assist uniformed services families with making
decisions concerning school choice and educational freedom accounts;
(3) Guidance for advance enrollment;
(4) Contact information for military family education
coordinators; and
(5) Purple Star School Program highlights and contact
information for military family education facilitators.
(j) The division shall provide administrative staff support to the Chair
of the Arkansas Council for Military Children to assist with the achievement
of the purpose and the administration of duties of the council.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 28, is amended to add
03-19-2025 14:25:09 TNL129

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 H3/19/25 HB1545
additional sections to read as follows:
Subchapter 3 — Purple Star School Program

6-28-301. Purple Star School Program.
(a) Each public school with twenty (20) or more children of military
families enrolled annually by October 1 shall:
(1) Adopt the Purple Star School Program developed by the
Arkansas Council for Military Children and approved by the Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education; and
(2) Survey arriving and departing uniform services families to
assess the effectiveness of programs and services under this chapter as
specified by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education.
(b) The purpose of the Purple Star School Program shall be to:
(1) Assist children of uniformed services families by addressing
the educational, social, and emotional challenges the children of uniformed
services families face during their transition to a new school; and
(2) Keep children of uniformed services families on track to
enroll and excel in college, enter the workforce, and become life-ready.
(c) The council-developed Purple Star School Program required under
subsection (a) of this section shall:
(1) Require each public school to designate a military family
education facilitator to:
(A) Identify military-connected students who are enrolled
in the public school and inform public school teachers of those students;
(B) Serve as the Purple Star School Program point of
contact for the public school, each child of a military family, and the
parent, legal guardian, person having lawful control of, or person standing
in loco parentis to a child of a military family; and
(C) Assist in determining and coordinating public school
services and programs for military-connected students;
(2) Require a designated public school district military family
education facilitator, public school military family education coordinator,
and public school staff to complete council-recommended and division-approved
initial and continuing education on identifying the needs and unique
challenges faced by children of members of the uniformed services;
(3) Require each public school district to include on its
03-19-2025 14:25:09 TNL129

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 H3/19/25 HB1545
website a "Military Families" section that informs uniformed services
families of:
(A) The student enrollment application process;
(B) Available education pathways;
(C) Notable public school or public school district Purple
Star School Programs;
(D) Public school district military family education
coordinator contact information; and
(E) Public school military family education facilitator
contact information;
(4)(A) Require each public school or public school district to
establish a volunteer student-to-student peer ambassador program that shall
be open to all enrolled students who want to contribute.
(B) The volunteer student-to-student peer ambassador
program required under subdivision (c)(4)(A) of this section shall:
(i) Connect and welcome inbound students ahead of
their transition to a public school;
(ii) Assist with the provision of new student
orientation; and
(iii) Assist new students with establishing social
connections at their new school;
(5) Establish school and community events to honor and recognize
members of the uniformed services and military-connected students;
(6) Ensure that a public school or public school district
appoints a volunteer uniformed services member, military spouse, or
representative from a military installation or unit to serve on the school
community and family engagement committee;
(7) Ensure that a public school district's or public school's
parent and family engagement plan required under § 6-15-1702 addresses
relevant military family issues and resources; and
(8) Require public schools and public school districts to
collaborate with military commands to encourage uniformed services families
to self-identify their military status.
(d) The Purple Star School Program required under subsection (a) of
this section may authorize public schools and public school districts to
expand their Purple Star School Program to include community-level
03-19-2025 14:25:09 TNL129

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 H3/19/25 HB1545
initiatives, including without limitation:
(1) Engaging community organizations, local businesses, and
military installations to enhance resources and support for military-
connected students and their families;
(2) Organizing community events that raise awareness of
military-connected students and their contributions; and
(3) Establishing partnerships with regional stakeholders to
enhance Purple Star School Program efforts while fulfilling all requirements
for the Purple Star School Program established by the division.
(e) As used in this section, a "military-connected student" is:
(1) An incoming or a currently enrolled student who is a child
or dependent of a current or former active or reserve component uniformed
services member;
(2) A child of a uniformed services member who died while on
active duty or as a result of injuries sustained while on active duty;
(3) A student who is a sibling of a uniformed services member;
(4) A student who has enlisted in the uniformed services; or
(5) A Junior Reserve Officers' Training Corps cadet.

6-28-302. Arkansas Council for Military Children — Purple Star School
Program — Duties.
The Arkansas Council for Military Children shall:
(1) Develop and review biennially and amend as necessary the
Purple Star School Program model;
(2) When developing, reviewing, and amending the Purple Star
School Program as required under subdivision (1) of this section, incorporate
provisions prescribed by the council, the Military Child Education Coalition,
and other relevant, recognized authorities;
(3) Use the Purple Star School Program's application and renewal
process along with interdistrict collaboration events to drive continuous
improvement of the program;
(4) Define required and optional Purple Star School Program
provisions established by § 6-28-301 and performance standards;
(5) Establish phase-in timing and training, if required, when
adopting or amending Purple Star School Program provisions; and
(6) Establish a recognition program for public schools, public
03-19-2025 14:25:09 TNL129

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 H3/19/25 HB1545
school districts, and private schools that meet Purple Star School Program
standards as defined and evaluated by the council.

6-28-303. Division of Elementary and Secondary Education — Purple Star
School Program — Duties.
The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall:
(1) Provide relevant resources for the orientation and training
of public school district military family education coordinators and public
school military family education facilitators under this chapter;
(2) Administer the Purple Star School Program;
(3) Provide administrative and logistical support to the
Arkansas Council for Military Children to develop the program; and
(4) Promulgate and incorporate Purple Star School program rules
into the rules the division promulgates under this chapter.

/s/K. Brown




















03-19-2025 14:25:09 TNL129